California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
“Processor” means an establishment in which, for compensation directly or indirectly, meat or meat products are cut, wrapped, or frozen to be delivered for frozen storage by the ultimate customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

20020.

“Point of sale” as used in Section 22004.1 means the first place where the transaction occurs when the hide is sold or otherwise transferred by the person who slaughtered the animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

20021.

“Modified point of origin inspection,” as provided in Sections 21111 and 21112, pertains only to the inspection of cattle where there is no sale within a designated modified point of origin inspection area prior to transportation for pasture-to-pasture purposes when crossing the area boundary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 592, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20022.

“Full point of origin inspection area” means any area designated by the director, by regulation, pursuant to Sections 21141 and 21141.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 210, Sec. 2.   Effective May 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

20023.

“Full point of origin inspection” as provided in Sections 21141 and 21141.5 means the inspection of all cattle, except as herein excepted, prior to transportation across the area boundary. However, pasture-to-pasture movement within the area is permitted without inspection, and cattle moving to a destination point within the area shall pay the destination inspection fee only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 592, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20024.

“Destination point inspection” means the inspection of cattle within the California borders after shipment directly to a posted stockyard, public salesyard, private cattle sales market, licensed slaughterhouse, or registered feedlot, without prior inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 210, Sec. 4.   Effective May 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

20025.

“Cattle movement” means the transportation of cattle by vehicle or herding, such as a drive of an animal herd.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 210, Sec. 5.   Effective May 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

20026.

“Private treaty transaction,” as used in this division, means the transfer of ownership of cattle or livestock by agreement or contract, at a point other than a destination point.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 210, Sec. 6.   Effective May 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

20027.

“Pasture-to-pasture movement” means transportation of cattle, or leading or herding from one feeding or pasture premise to another feeding or pasture premise with no change of ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 210, Sec. 7.   Effective May 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

20028.

“Transportation, transport, or transporting” as used in this division means to carry livestock from one place to another by means of a vehicle which may be propelled, moved, or drawn on land or water, or may be airborne.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 592, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20029.

“Shipper” means any person who transfers cattle from one geographical location to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20030.

“Licensed slaughterer” means any person who is in the business of slaughtering bovine animals and who has applied to and been issued a grant of inspection by the United States Department of Agriculture Food Safety and Inspection Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [20151. - 20283.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [20151. - 20152.]

20151.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that this division is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the cattle industry of this state from losses of livestock by theft and straying. 

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the protection should be afforded through a system of brand inspection of cattle as the cattle are moved and marketed within this state, and that, to the extent that adequate funding is made available, an investigative unit be maintained within the department for the purpose of assisting local law enforcement agencies in combating cattle theft in this state. 

(c) The department shall develop a surveillance patrol program, to the extent that adequate funding is made available, to assist in the detection and apprehension of persons involved in cattle theft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   Effective August 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

20152.

The provisions of this division, including the payment of fees, are applicable to all state and county institutions which are engaging in livestock operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Regulation [20171. - 20172.]

20171.

The director may make such regulations as may be reasonably necessary to carry out this division and to protect the cattle of this state from theft and misappropriation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20172.

The regulations shall be published in one or more stock journals of general circulation in the state before they become effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigations [20201. - 20203.]

20201.

The director may make any necessary investigations relative to reported violations of this division, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20202.

The person in custody of any records required to be kept by any provision of Divisions 9 (commencing with Section 16301), 10 (commencing with Section 20001), or 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall exhibit such records upon demand by any inspector or peace officer.

Such records include, but are not limited to, the following documents:

(a) Brand inspection certificates.

(b) Bills of sale or bills of consignment.

(c) Truck invoices and bills of lading.

(d) Shipping and receiving slips.

(e) Sales invoices or certificate of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

20203.

It is unlawful for any person to refuse to exhibit any records to any inspector or peace officer who is acting in accordance with the provisions of Section 20202.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Criminal Penalties [20221. - 20222.]

20221.

Every person that violates this division is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day constitutes a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 812, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20222.

Any person who uses an unrecorded, forfeited, or canceled brand shall pay a penalty upon a first violation of one hundred dollars ($100); upon a second violation within the same 12-month period, a penalty of two hundred dollars ($200); and upon a third or subsequent violation within the same 12-month period, a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500), which is in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Civil Penalties and Remedies [20251. - 20253.]

20251.

Any person that violates any provision of this division, or any regulation which is issued pursuant to it, is liable civilly for a penalty in an amount not to exceed a sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. Any money which is recovered under this section shall be paid into the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20252.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action for civil penalties in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20253.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court for an injunction against any person violating any provision of this division or any regulation which is duly issued by the director pursuant to it.

Any proceedings pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Collection and Disposition of Money [20281. - 20283.]

20281.

The department shall, at least once a month, report to the State Controller the total amount of money collected for fees, penalties, judgments, or otherwise. It shall, at the same time, pay into the State Treasury the entire amount of such receipts. The receipts shall be credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20282.

Any money in the Department of Agriculture Fund derived under any of the provisions of this division may be expended for the administration and enforcement of any of the provisions of this code stated in Section 16461, notwithstanding any other provision of law which limits the expenditure of any such money to some specific section, article, or chapter of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

20283.

A civil action may be brought by the department to recover any fee, penalty, or other money that becomes due pursuant to this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Enforcement [20401. - 20471.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bureau of Livestock Identification [20401. - 20407.]

20401.

There is in the department the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20402.

The bureau is administered by a chief who is appointed by the director pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500), Division 5, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20403.

The chief shall administer and enforce this division and shall perform such other duties within the scope of his employment as the director may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20404.

The chief is responsible to the director for the proper administration and enforcement of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20405.

The chief shall assist in the prosecution of persons charged with violation of any provision of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20406.

Subject to the approval of the director, the chief shall appoint such inspectors and other assistants as may be necessary to carry out this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20407.

Subject to the approval of the director, the chief may employ investigators to investigate reported thefts or losses of cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inspectors and Other Peace Officers [20432. - 20440.]

20432.

Each inspector may enforce the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 484), Title 13, Part 1 of the Penal Code, with reference to theft of any animal or carcass, and is authorized, as a public officer, to arrest for any such offense. In the event of an arrest pursuant to this section, the provisions of Section 835a of the Penal Code shall apply as if the inspector were a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

20433.

Each sheriff, member of the California Highway Patrol, and other peace officer shall cooperate and assist in enforcing this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20434.

Each sheriff or other officer to whom a complaint which relates to the loss or theft of cattle is made shall forthwith transmit to the bureau a report which shows all of the following:

(a) The number of animals that are involved.

(b) A description of the animals, including any marks and brands on them.

(c) The date of the loss or theft.

(d) Any other information which the chief may by regulation require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20435.

If an inspector or peace officer finds any animal, hide, carcass, or portion of a carcass in the possession of any person that he has reason to believe is not the legal owner or entitled to the possession of it, he shall take possession of it or notify the person in possession where to leave it pending investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

20436.

A person shall not, without a release from the inspector or peace officer, dispose of the animal, hide, carcass, or portion of a carcass within 30 days after receiving the notice pursuant to Section 20435 or until it is released by the inspector or peace officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20437.

Any animal, hide, carcass, or portion of a carcass shall not be held pursuant to Section 20435 for more than 30 consecutive days, unless the notice of seizure is renewed by the inspector or peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20438.

Any inspector or peace officer may stop any conveyance which is transporting any animal, hide, carcass, or portion of a carcass on any public thoroughfare for the purpose of making an investigation and may take possession of the animal, hide, carcass, or portion of a carcass and hold it for not to exceed 30 days pending an investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20439.

Any expense which is incurred in caring for any property which is seized pursuant to this article shall be paid by the owner of the property. The cost of caring for the property so held is a lien upon the property. The lien may be enforced in the manner which is prescribed in Section 3052 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20440.

Any animal which is seized by or comes into the possession of an inspector pursuant to this division shall be disposed of as provided in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 1, Division 9 of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Livestock Identification Advisory Board [20461. - 20471.]

20461.

As used in this article, “board” means the Livestock Identification Advisory Board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20462.

There is in the department the Livestock Identification Advisory Board, which consists of seven members. The director may appoint one additional member on the board, as provided in Section 20463.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

20462.5.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that persons appointed to the Livestock Identification Advisory Board pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of the particular agricultural industries concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such board, the particular agricultural industries concerned are tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------

20463.

The director shall appoint the members to the board as follows:

(a) Two shall be beef cattle producers.

(b) Two shall be dairymen.

(c) One shall be engaged in the livestock marketing business.

(d) Two shall be operators of registered feedlots.

The director may appoint one additional member on the board, who shall be a public member. Upon the director’s request, the board shall submit to the director the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, or processor nor financially interested in any producer, shipper, or processor, for appointment by the director as a public member of the board. The director may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the board. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the director, the board shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the director has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the board shall be filled by appointment by the director from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified submitted by the board. The public member of the board shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the board and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

20464.

In making his selection of the membership of the board, the director shall take into consideration the recommendations of organizations and associations of cattlemen, dairymen, livestock marketing agencies, and general farm organizations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20465.

The term of office of the members of the board is four years. Any vacancy which occurs during an unexpired term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20466.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation but are entitled to their traveling expenses in the same amount as is provided for other nonsalaried board and commission members who serve the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20467.

The board shall assist the director and the Chief of the Bureau of Livestock Identification in the administration and enforcement of Part 1 (commencing with Section 16301) and Part 2 (commencing with Section 17401) of Division 9, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18351) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 3 of Division 9, Division 10 (commencing with Section 20001), and Division 11 (commencing with Section 23001). The board shall make recommendations to the director concerning such administration and enforcement. Any such recommendation shall be made effective upon approval of the director, including recommendations under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 20469.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

20468.

The members of the board shall confer with all of the following regarding matters which are involved in the administration of the enforcement functions of the Bureau of Livestock Identification:

(a) The director and the Chief of the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(b) Livestock producers and marketers.

(c) Farm and livestock organizations.

(d) Other cooperating agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

20469.

The board shall make recommendations to the director and to the Chief of the Bureau of Livestock Identification relative to all of the following:

(a) Improvements and changes in the administration and enforcement of the hide and brand laws and regulations which are adopted pursuant to such laws.

(b) Procedures which are followed by the Bureau of Livestock Identification. 

(c) Curbing of livestock thefts.

(d) The annual budget for the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(e) Legislation which is designed to improve the functioning of the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

20470.

The board shall meet at the call of its chairperson. It shall meet at least twice in every calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 2483)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20471.

The meetings of the board shall be held in the offices of the department at Sacramento, or elsewhere within the state, if necessary for the proper performance of its duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Brands and Brand Records Generally [20601. - 20797.]



  ARTICLE 1. Requirements [20601. - 20610.]

20601.

It is the ultimate object of this division to provide for statewide recordation of brands with the entire state as one branding district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20602.

Brands for the purpose of establishing or indicating ownership of cattle may be recorded pursuant to this chapter. Brands for other purposes shall not be recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20603.

The chief shall, by regulation, prescribe the location on the animal where different types of brands, including recorded brands and cattle record brands, may be applied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20604.

It is unlawful for any person to brand any animal except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20605.

It is unlawful for any person to use an unrecorded, forfeited, or canceled brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20606.

It is unlawful for any person to apply a recorded brand in any location on the animal except that which is specified on the brand registration certificate.

The use of a brand on any location except that which is specified on the brand registration certificate is the same as the use of an unrecorded brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20607.

It is unlawful for any person to use a brand on cattle indicating ownership unless the cattle are owned by him or he has been authorized by the owner of the cattle and the brand is recorded under the owner’s name and is on file with the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20608.

Proof of possession or ownership of cattle with an unrecorded, forfeited, or canceled brand establishes a rebuttable presumption that the person in possession or the owner of the cattle has branded them with such brand. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

20609.

In every suit at law or in equity, if the title to any animal is involved, proof of the brand of the animal establishes a rebuttable presumption that the owner of the brand was the owner of the animal at all times during which the brand was duly recorded as provided in this code. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

The right of any person to use such brand may be established by a certified copy of the brand records on file in the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

20610.

(a) The owner of cattle brought into this state from out of state for grazing purposes may apply to the director for a permit to allow the branding of the cattle with a brand recorded in another state. The director may issue a permit for this purpose under all of the following conditions:

(1) The owner of an identical brand recorded for use in this state has been notified and has given written consent for the use of the brand.

(2) The brand is limited to use on suckling calves which are accompanied by their mothers bearing the same brand.

(3) The herd is inspected by the bureau prior to branding.

(b) The director may charge a fee for inspection as provided in Article 9 (commencing with Section 21281) of Chapter 6, including a time and mileage charge, to cover the cost of providing the inspection.

(c) The director may establish and charge a fee to cover the cost of issuing the permit authorized by this section. The fee for the permit shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(d) This section is applicable only to those cattle brought into this state from a state which has implemented a reciprocal program for cattle from this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Venting Brand Requirements [20631. - 20633.]

20631.

Venting a brand consists of rebranding a branded animal, by the owner of the animal, for the purpose of voiding his prior brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20632.

A vent brand may be applied on the loin of an animal which corresponds to the side the owner’s registered brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20633.

Only the owner’s recorded brand may be used as a vent. Recordings shall not be issued which allow the use of any other brand as a vent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Applications [20661. - 20672.]

20661.

Any person that desires to use a brand in this state may acquire the right to do so pursuant to this chapter. Application forms for this purpose shall be furnished by the bureau upon request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20662.

To conform to the objective of this chapter, all applications for the recordation of a brand shall be accepted by the chief only if the proposed brand design fulfills the following requirements:

(a) Is not in conflict with any other recorded brand in this state.

(b) Is capable of producing a like design when burned into the hide of an animal.

(c) Is capable of readily symbolizing the intended design to any person who views it.

(d) Lends itself to common verbal description.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

20663.

An application for the recordation of a brand shall be filed with the bureau.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20664.

The application shall contain all of the following:

(a) A facsimile of the brand which is sought to be recorded.

(b) A statement of the location on the animal where the brand is to be applied.

(c) The name and address of the applicant.

(d) The signature of a parent or guardian if the applicant is under 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

20665.

A mark may be recorded only with a brand. If a mark is sought to be recorded with a brand, the application shall also contain a diagram which shows the manner of marking.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20666.

Upon receipt of an application, the bureau shall examine the application and compare the design applied for with brands that are already of record.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20667.

An application shall not be accepted for the recordation of a brand which consists only of a mark.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20668.

An application shall not be accepted for the recordation of a brand if the brand is to be applied to any of the following:

(a) Either jaw.

(b) The face.

(c) The nose.

(d) Either loin.

(e) The breeching of an animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20669.

An application shall not be accepted for the recordation of a brand which is accompanied by a mark if the use of the mark involves cutting off more than one-half of an ear.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20670.

An application shall not be accepted for the recordation of a brand except upon the payment of the fee for the recordation of the brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20671.

If the application does not conform to the requirements of, or cannot be accepted pursuant to, this chapter, a statement of the reason why it cannot be accepted shall be transmitted to the applicant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20672.

Any person who is aggrieved at any determination made pursuant to Section 20662 may appeal in person to the Livestock Identification Advisory Board. Upon receipt of a written request from the person appealing the decision, such person shall be permitted to present his views to the board. The board may recommend to the director to affirm, reverse, or modify the determination. The decision of the director shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recordation [20691. - 20701.]

20691.

The bureau shall maintain a record of all brands that are recorded, except forfeited or canceled brands which are subject to Section 20701.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20692.

Any person, upon request to the bureau, shall be furnished information as to any recorded brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20693.

A brand shall not be recorded if it consists of any letters or characters which are applied in more than one branding location on the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20694.

A brand shall not be recorded for any person under 18 years of age unless the application is countersigned by his parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

20695.

Recordation of a brand consists of entering in the brand records the matters which are contained in the application, together with the date of recordation, and the execution by the bureau of a cattle brand registration certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20696.

The original cattle brand registration certificate shall be kept on file in the bureau. A duplicate certificate shall be issued to the person in whose name the brand is recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20697.

The issuance to a person of a cattle brand registration certificate confers upon the person to whom it is issued both of the following:

(a) The right to use the brand until the right to use it is forfeited or the record of the brand is canceled pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The right to use the same brand on the same location on horses, mules, burros, sheep, and swine if not in conflict with a previously recorded brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20698.

The right to use a brand is a property right and may be sold or otherwise transferred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20699.

A transferee of a brand shall not use the brand until the transfer has been recorded by the bureau.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20700.

The record of any brand may be canceled at any time upon the written request of the person in whose name it is recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20701.

The records of brands which have been forfeited or canceled for more than five years may be removed from the files and destroyed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Suspension and Forfeiture [20721. - 20725.]

20721.

The right to use a recorded brand is lost by the failure to pay the fees which are required by Article 6 (commencing with Section 20751) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20722.

If the renewal fee that is required by Article 6 (commencing with Section 20751) is not paid by April 30th following the recordation of the brand, or by April 30th of the year that follows the last year for which the renewal fee has been paid, the right to use the brand is suspended by operation of law as of April 1st of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20723.

If the right to use a brand is suspended for more than one year, the right is forfeited on April 1st following the year of suspension. The brand, thereafter, may be rerecorded by the former owner or it may be applied for by any other person pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20724.

The right to use any brand which conflicts with any brand which has a prior cattle brand registration certificate number pursuant to this chapter is forfeited. All recordations shall be on a statewide basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20725.

(a) Any person convicted of Section 487a of the Penal Code shall be prohibited from registering or owning, in whole or in part, a brand for a period of five years following the date of the conviction. 

(b) Upon being notified of the conviction, the secretary shall terminate the registration of any brand registered to a person convicted of Section 487a of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (AB 1722)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fees and Penalties [20751. - 20760.]

20751.

The fee for each application for recording a brand is seventy dollars ($70).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20752.

The fee entitles the applicant to the recordation of one brand, one duplicate brand registration certificate, and the right to use the brand until the following April 1st. The fee for each additional duplicate is ten dollars ($10).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

20754.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 20755, the owner of a brand shall, on or before April 30 after its recordation, pay to the bureau a biennial period renewal fee of seventy dollars ($70) for the right to continue to use the brand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20755.

The owner of a recorded brand may, on or before April 30 of any year, pay in advance to the bureau a sum that is a multiple of seventy dollars ($70). The payment entitles him or her to use the brand for a minimum of two years, but not to exceed 10 years, at the rate of thirty-five dollars ($35) per year on and after April 1 of that year. If the advance payment is made, biennial renewals for the years within the period for which advance payment has been made are not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 3.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20756.

If the right to use a brand is suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee, it may be reinstated within one year from the date of suspension upon the payment of the biennial renewal fee of seventy dollars ($70) plus a twenty-five dollar ($25) penalty fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 4.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20757.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the fee for rerecording a forfeited or canceled brand shall be one hundred forty dollars ($140). This amount shall accompany the application to rerecord.

(b) When a penalty has been paid pursuant to Section 20222, within 30 days of the date the application to rerecord is received by the secretary, the fee to rerecord shall be seventy dollars ($70).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 5.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20758.

The fee for recording the transfer of a brand, including a new certificate, is seventy dollars ($70).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 406, Sec. 6.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20759.

If the applicant fails to submit within 60 days of the date of receipt by the department of application for recording or re-recording a brand, or for recording the transfer of a brand, any information or document which is required by this chapter, the application lapses. The applicant is not entitled to the recording or re-recording of the brand, or the recording of the transfer of the brand, unless and until he submits a new application and another fee for it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20760.

The fees or penalties prescribed in this article may be raised or lowered under one of the following conditions:

(a) Lowered by the director, based upon a finding and recommendation of the Livestock Identification Advisory Board, whenever they determine that the cost of administering and enforcing the provisions of this division may be maintained with a lower fee.
